District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.07a

References deemed to refer to the President and Chief Executive Officer of the Washington Convention and Sports Authority.

References in any District of Columbia law, rule, regulation, or the delegation of authority to the General Manager of the Washington Convention Center Authority, other than in § 10-1202.07(a-1), or the Chief Executive Officer and General Manager of the Washington Convention and Sports Authority shall be deemed to refer to the President and Chief Executive Officer of the Washington Convention and Sports Authority.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 207a
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-356, § 2(c), 58 DCR 760